South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4259.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 1 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 29 Statewide Provisions Section 1-1-1910.  All members of any state board or commission, or any board or commission of any political subdivision of this State, including school districts, must take the oath of office set forth in Section 5, Article VI of the Constitution of this State before they enter upon the duties of their respective office. SECTION 2.  If any member of a board or commission subject to Section 1-1-1910 took office prior to the effective date of this act without having taken the oath of office, then such member must take the oath of office at the next scheduled meeting of the board or commission. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----